Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-229
Officers, employees; exercise of political influence; violations; penalty.

Any officer or employee of such city who, by solicitation or otherwise, shall exert his influence directly or indirectly to influence any other officers or employees of such city to adopt his political views shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars or be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding thirty days.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 26, p. 433;

C.S.1922, § 3552;

C.S.1929, § 14-227;

R.S.1943, § 14-229.